Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 25 Education of Children Who Are Deaf or Blind [Repealed.]

16-25-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1896, ch. 322, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-1

; P.L. 1963, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 89, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 28; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 28; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 85, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 112, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 85, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1879, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 112, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 272, § 1, effective July 21, 1992; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 4; P.L. 1913, ch. 945, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 112, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-4

; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 28; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 28; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 5; P.L. 1913, ch. 945, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 112, § 5; P.L. 1929, ch. 1341, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-5

; P.L. 1992, ch. 272, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 28; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 28; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 85, § 4; P.L. 1898, ch. 545, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1048, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 100, § 4; redesignated § 6 by P.L. 1913, ch. 945, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 112, § 6; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 130, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 272, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

16-25-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 186, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-25-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 272, effective July 21, 1992.